src/morphology/affixes/adv.lexc
!! !!!Adverb inflection
!! Most adverbs are morphologically either sti-derivations of adjectives or
!! some specific form of an existing or archaic noun, and they have limited
!! inflection in form of possessives and clitics carried over. According to
!! modern dictionaries different forms of same root are separate adverbs,
!! so they are not inflected here, but listed in roots.

! possessives
LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Adverb possessive back
!!€ takanani: takana+Adv+PxSg1 behind me
+PxSg1:%>ni  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Adverb possessive front
!!€ edessäni: edessä+Adv+PxSg1 in front of me
+PxSg1:%>ni  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_AN
!!€gt-norm: Adverb possessive back an
!!€ takanaan: takana+Adv+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>an    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Adverb possessive back en
!!€ jalkeilleen: jalkeille+Adv+PxSg3 he awakened
+PxSg3:%>en    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Adverb possessive front en
!!€ keskelleen: keskelle+Adv+PxPl3 amidst them
+PxSg3:%>en    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
!!€gt-norm: Adverb possessive front än
!!€ edessään: edessä+Adv+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>än    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Adverb clitic back
!!€ nopeastihan: nopeasti+Adv+Foc/han fast
+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>han%>ko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>kaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>ko%>kin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>kaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>kin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pa%>ko   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>han  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>ko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaan%>han  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaan%>kin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaan%>ko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaan%>pa    #        ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Adverb clitic front
!!€ tyhmästihän: tyhmästi+Adv+Foc/han stupidly
+Foc/han:%>hän   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hän%>kö #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä #        ;
+Qst:%>kö #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>kään    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kö%>kin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kö%>s    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pä #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>kään    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>kin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pä%>kö   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>hän  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kään #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>kö    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pä    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kään%>hän  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kään%>kin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kään%>kö    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kään%>pä    #        ;


! shorthands

LEXICON ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ADV_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ADV_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT
0    ADV_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ADV_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    ADV_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    ADV_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ADV_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ADV_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    ADV_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    ADV_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

!LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_OPT
!0    ADV_BACK_POSS   ;
!0    ADV_BACK_CLIT ;
!0    #    ;
!
LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADV_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL
0   ADV_BACK_POSS  ;
0   ADV_BACK_POSS_AN   ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
0   ADV_BACK_POSS  ;
0   ADV_BACK_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN   ;
