src/morphology/stems/adv.lexc
LEXICON  ADV
altapäin+Adv:altapäin     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
ammolle+Adv:ammolle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
botaanisesti+Adv:botaanisesti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
edessä+Adv:edessä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
endeemisesti+Adv:endeemisesti  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
epätavallisesti+Adv:epä#tavallisesti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
epävireisesti+Adv:epä#vireisesti  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
hajalle+Adv:hajalle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
hallussa+Adv:hallussa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
haltioihinsa+Adv:haltioihinsa     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
haralle+Adv:haralle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
harille+Adv:harille  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
heitteille+Adv:heitteille  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
henkitoreihin+Adv:henkitoreihin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
hereillä+Adv:hereillä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
huostassa+Adv:huostassa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
hupaisasti+Adv:hupaisasti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
hämilleen+Adv:hämilleen  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
hämmennyksiin+Adv:hämmennyksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
hämmennyksissä+Adv:hämmennyksissä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
hätäännyksissä+Adv:hätäännyksissä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;
hörölle+Adv:hörölle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
höröllä+Adv:höröllä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
ilmatiiviisti+Adv:ilma#tiiviisti  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
istualle+Adv:istualle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
jalkeille+Adv:jalkeille  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
joutessa+Adv:joutessa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL  ;
julkeasti+Adv:julkeasti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
jäljestä+Adv:jäljestä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
jälkeen+Adv:jälkeen  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
jäntevästi+Adv:jäntevästi  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
kannalla+Adv:kannalla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
kateissa+Adv:kateissa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL  ;
kauemmin+Adv:kauemmin     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
keskelle+Adv:keskelle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
kesken+Adv:kesken  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
keskestä+Adv:keskestä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
keväisin+Adv:keväisin  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
kimppuun+Adv:kimppuun  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
kohdatusten+Adv:kohdatusten     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
koholle+Adv:koholle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
kotia+Adv:kotia  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
kuiville+Adv:kuiville  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
kulussa+Adv:kulussa     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
kuohuksiin+Adv:kuohuksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
kuohuksissa+Adv:kuohuksissa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
kuumaverisesti+Adv:kuuma#verisesti  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
kätevästi+Adv:kätevästi  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
käymäseltä+Adv:käymäseltä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
latteasti+Adv:latteasti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
lerpalla+Adv:lerpalla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
lerpalle+Adv:lerpalle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
likelle+Adv:likelle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
lipevästi+Adv:lipevästi  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
lurpalla+Adv:lurpalla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
lurpalle+Adv:lurpalle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
luvuttomasti+Adv:luvuttomasti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
lähelle+Adv:lähelle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
läheltä+Adv:läheltä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
lähettyville+Adv:lähettyville  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
lähettyvillä+Adv:lähettyvillä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;
läkähdyksiin+Adv:läkähdyksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
löytymättömiin+Adv:löytymättömiin  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
makuulle+Adv:makuulle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
meneillä+Adv:meneillä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
miten+Adv:miten  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
monituhatkertaisesti+Adv:monituhatkertaisesti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
mukaan+Adv:mukaa  ADV_BACK_POSS  ;
mutrulla+Adv:mutrulla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
mutrulle+Adv:mutrulle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
nukuksiin+Adv:nukuksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
näkyville+Adv:näkyville  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
näkyvissä+Adv:näkyvissä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
ojolla+Adv:ojolla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
paikalle+Adv:paikalle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;
paikallisesti+Adv:paikallisesti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
pakahduksiin+Adv:pakahduksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
palelluksissa+Adv:palelluksissa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
perheittäin+Adv:perheittäin  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
perältä+Adv:perältä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;
perästä+Adv:perästä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
perään+Adv:perään  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
piloilla+Adv:piloilla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL  ;
pitkälle+Adv:pitkälle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
pitkällä+Adv:pitkällä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;
puolikuoliaaksi+Adv:puolikuoliaaksi     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
päälle+Adv:päälle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
päällimmiten+Adv:päällimmiten  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
pökerryksiin+Adv:pökerryksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
pökerryksissä+Adv:pökerryksissä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
pörhölle+Adv:pörhölle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
pörrölle+Adv:pörrölle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
pöyhölle+Adv:pöyhölle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
pöyhöllä+Adv:pöyhöllä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
riipalle+Adv:riipalle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
rinnalla+Adv:rinnalla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
rökkiin+Adv:rökkiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
samankaltaisesti+Adv:samankaltaisesti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
seisaalle+Adv:seisaalle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
seisoalla+Adv:seisoalla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
seisoville+Adv:seisoville  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
seisovilta+Adv:seisovilta  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL  ;
silleen+Adv:silleen  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
sirrille+Adv:sirrille  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL  ;
sirrillä+Adv:sirrillä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;
sisimmältä+Adv:sisimmältä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;
sisälle+Adv:sisälle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
sisässä+Adv:sisässä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
supulla+Adv:supulla  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
supulle+Adv:supulle  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
suruttomasti+Adv:suruttomasti     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
suutuksiin+Adv:suutuksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
syvempää+Adv:syvempää  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
tainnoksista+Adv:tainnoksista  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
tainnuksiin+Adv:tainnuksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
takana+Adv:takana  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
todella+Adv:todella     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
tuohduksissa+Adv:tuohduksissa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
typerryksiin+Adv:typerryksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
typerryksistä+Adv:typerryksistä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
tännemmäs+Adv:tännemmäs  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
ulottuville+Adv:ulottuville  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
ulottuvista+Adv:ulottuvista  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
uudelleen+Adv:uudelleen     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
uuvuksiin+Adv:uuvuksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
vallasta+Adv:vallasta  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
valveille+Adv:valveille  ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
vastaan+Adv:vastaan  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
vierelle+Adv:vierelle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
vierestä+Adv:vierestä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
vieritse+Adv:vieritse  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
vimmastuksissa+Adv:vimmastuksissa  ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
voivuksiin+Adv:voivuksiin  ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
vähin+Adv:vähin  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
välille+Adv:välille  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
välimailta+Adv:väli#mailta     ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
ylettyville+Adv:ylettyville  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
ylettyvillä+Adv:ylettyvillä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
ylle+Adv:ylle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
ymmälle+Adv:ymmälle  ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
ymmällä+Adv:ymmällä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
ymmärrettävästi+Adv:ymmärrettävästi  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
äkkiseltä+Adv:äkkiseltä  ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
